Rhode Island, session 2025, SB166.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-19.1-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-19.1 entitled
"Pharmacies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-19.1-31. Administration of influenza immunizations to individuals between the ages
of nine (9) years and eighteen (18) years, inclusive Administration of influenza and COVID-
19 immunizations to individuals between the ages of three (3) years and eighteen (18) years,
inclusive.
(a) Parental consent shall be required for all pharmacist-administered immunizations for
individuals under the age of eighteen (18) years.
(b) The department of health shall require a pharmacist who is authorized to administer
influenza and COVID-19 immunizations to individuals between the ages of nine (9) three (3) years
and eighteen (18) years, inclusive, pursuant to § 5-19.1-2, to electronically report to the department
all immunizations administered within seven (7) days of administration in the format and for the
populations required by the department.
(c)(1) The department of health shall require a pharmacist who is authorized to administer
influenza and COVID-19 immunizations to individuals between the ages of nine (9) three (3) years
and eighteen (18) years, inclusive, pursuant to § 5-19.1-2 to provide notification of a patient’s
immunization to the patient’s primary care provider, if known, within fourteen (14) days of
administration.
(2) The department of health’s rules and regulations shall include provisions to ensure that

the administering pharmacist make a good-faith effort to obtain information relating to the identity
of a patient’s primary care provider or primary care practice, for the purposes of fulfilling the
reporting requirements of subsection (c)(1) herein. If a patient does not have an existing relationship
with a primary care provider or primary care practice, the administering pharmacist shall proceed
with the reporting requirements contained in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001055/SUB B
========
LC001055/SUB B - Page 2 of 3